Massachusetts, session 194th, S2212.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 6 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 15YYYYYY, the following section:-
Section 15AAAAAAA. The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart
the first Wednesday in May as Massachusetts State Parks Day in recognition of the importance
to promote, enhance and maintain the Commonwealth’s park land and recreational facilities,
aiming to create a world class parks system, and recommend that the day be observed in an
appropriate manner by the people.
of 1